North Carolina, session 2025, SB293.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Town of Pinetops
the nonrecurring sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for the 2025-2026 fiscal year
to be allocated to the volunteer fire department operated by the town for equipment needs.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S293-v-1*